Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2721
Audit.

The city shall provide for an annual, outside, independent audit of its economic development program by a qualified private auditing business. The auditing business shall not, at the time of the audit or for any period during the term subject to the audit, have any contractual or business relationship with any qualifying business receiving funds or assistance under the economic development program or any financial institution directly involved with a qualifying business receiving funds or assistance under the economic development program. The results of such audit shall be filed with the city clerk and made available for public review during normal business hours.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 22.